Utah statutes.
58-39a-3.   Board -- Composition -- Duties.
(1)  There is created an Alternative Dispute Resolution Providers
Certification Board consisting of seven members who have a demonstrated
interest in ADR.  The board shall be established by August 1, 1991.
(a)  No more than three members may represent any one profession.
(b)  The board shall include one attorney, two judges, and four members of the
general public who have a demonstrated interest in ADR.
(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section
58-1-201 except number of members and qualifications are governed by this
section.
(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with
Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203 as applicable to certification.
